Washington statutes.
RCW 36.82.120

Purchases of road material extraction equipment—Proceeds to road fund.

All proceeds from the sale or placing of any crushed rock, gravel or other road building material shall be deposited in the county road fund to be expended under the same provisions as are by law imposed upon the funds used to produce the crushed rock, gravel, or other road building material extracted and sold.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.82.120. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 44, part; RRS s 6450-44, part.]